Hawaii statutes.
§501-31 Transfers pending
application; temporary record; final record. After the filing of an
application, and before registration, the land therein described may be dealt
with and instruments relating thereto shall be recorded and indexed by the
registrar of conveyances in the usual manner and also entered in the index of
applications; provided that such instruments shall state that application to
register the land is pending and shall state the application number. A
certified copy thereof shall be filed with the application. When any such
instrument purports to convey the whole or any interest in the land, the
original instrument, with the original signature, after recording shall be sent
to the land court and filed with the application, whereupon the certified copy
may be withdrawn.

As soon as an application is disposed of, the
registrar shall make a memorandum stating the disposition of the case and shall
send the same to the assistant registrar, who shall record and index it with
the records of deeds in the bureau of conveyances, and in the index of
applications. If the proceedings upon the application end in a decree of
registration of title the land included therein shall, as soon as the decree is
transcribed, as provided in section 501-75, become registered land. Thereafter
no deeds or other instruments relating solely to such land shall be recorded
with the records of deeds, but shall be registered in the registration book and
filed or recorded and indexed with the records and documents relating to
registered land. [L 1903, c 56, §29; RL 1925, §3218; am L 1927, c 258, §5; RL
1935, §5022; RL 1945, §12622; RL 1955, §342-23; HRS §501-31; am L 1986, c 246,
§3; am L 1995, c 22, §3]

Rules of Court

Record of disposition, see RLC rule 54.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next